Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Nine Hundred Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($925,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
carry out the provisions of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 259 of the 2nd
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Board shall deposit the sum of
Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) to the Rural Economic Action
Plan Water Projects Fund (225), created pursuant to Section 2002.1
of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Board may enter into
contracts with financial institutions and execute such instruments
as may be necessary to hold and disseminate loan funds in accordance
with applicable regulations and Board policies.

SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Two Million Dollars
($2,000,000.00) shall be used for a project to design a regional
water system in northeast Oklahoma.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1175 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1175 Page 3